Mississippi, session 2026, HB467.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MISSISSIPPI: SECTION 1.  Section 45-2-1, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 45-2-1.  (1)  Whenever used in this section, the term: (a)  "Covered individual" means a law enforcement officer or firefighter, including volunteer firefighters, as defined in this section when employed by an employer as defined in this section; it does not include employees of independent contractors. (b) "Employer" means a state board, commission, department, division, bureau or agency, or a county, municipality or other political subdivision of the state, which employs, appoints or otherwise engages the services of covered individuals. (c) "Firefighter" means an individual who is trained for the prevention and control of loss of life and property from fire or other emergencies, who is assigned to firefighting activity, and is required to respond to alarms and perform emergency actions at the location of a fire, hazardous materials or other emergency incident. (d)  "Law enforcement officer" means any lawfully sworn officer, school resource officer or employee of the state or any political subdivision of the state whose duties require the officer or employee to investigate, pursue, apprehend, arrest, transport or maintain custody of persons who are charged with, suspected of committing, or convicted of a crime, whether the officer is on regular duty on full-time status, an auxiliary or reserve officer, or is serving on a temporary or part-time status. (e)  "Cause of death" means any cause of death that would be covered under the Public Safety Officers' Benefits Act of 1976, the Hometown Heroes Survivors Benefits Act of 2003, generally codified at 42 USCS Chapter 46, or the Safeguarding America's First Responders Act of 2020. (2)  (a)  The Department of Public Safety shall make a payment, as provided in this section, in the amount of One Hundred Thousand Dollars ($100,000.00) when a covered individual, while engaged in the performance of the person's official duties, dies or receives accidental or intentional bodily injury that results in the loss of the covered individual's life and such death is the result of a covered cause of death, provided that the death is not the result of suicide and that the bodily injury is not intentionally self-inflicted. (b)  The payment provided for in this subsection shall be made to the beneficiary who was designated in writing by the covered individual, signed by the covered individual and delivered to the employer during the covered individual's lifetime.  If no such designation is made, then the payment shall be made to the surviving child or children and spouse in equal portions, and if there is no surviving child or spouse, then to the parent or parents.  If a beneficiary is not designated and there is no surviving child, spouse or parent, then the payment shall be made to the covered individual's estate. (c)  The payment made in this subsection is in addition to any workers' compensation or pension benefits and is exempt from the claims and demands of creditors of the covered individual. (3)  (a)  There is established in the State Treasury a special fund to be known as the Law Enforcement Officers and Firefighters Death Benefits Trust Fund.  The trust fund shall be funded by an initial appropriation of Two Hundred Thousand Dollars ($200,000.00), and shall be comprised of any additional funds made available by the Legislature or by donation, contribution, gift or any other source. (b)  The State Treasurer shall invest the monies of the trust fund in any of the investments authorized for the funds of the Public Employees' Retirement System under Section 25-11-121, and those investments shall be subject to the limitations prescribed by Section 25-11-121. (c)  Unexpended amounts remaining in the trust fund at the end of the state fiscal year shall not lapse into the State General Fund, and any income earned on amounts in the trust fund shall be deposited to the credit of the trust fund.  However, any unexpended amounts transferred in accordance with Section 2 of Chapter 315, Laws of 2022, and remaining in the trust fund at the end of the state fiscal year shall lapse into the Coronavirus State Fiscal Recovery Fund. (4)  The Department of Public Safety shall be responsible for the management of the trust fund and the disbursement of death benefits authorized under this section.  The Department of Public Safety shall adopt rules and regulations necessary to implement and standardize the payment of death benefits under this section, to administer the trust fund created by this section and to carry out the purposes of this section. SECTION 2.  Section 45-2-21, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 45-2-21.  (1)  Whenever used in this section, the term: (a)  "Covered individual" means a law enforcement officer or firefighter, including volunteer firefighters, as defined in this section while actively engaged in protecting the lives and property of the citizens of this state when employed by an employer as defined in this section; it does not include employees of independent contractors. (b) "Employer" means a state board, commission, department, division, bureau, or agency, or a county, municipality or other political subdivision of the state, which employs, appoints or otherwise engages the services of covered individuals. (c) "Firefighter" means an individual who is trained for the prevention and control of loss of life and property from fire or other emergencies, who is assigned to firefighting activity, and is required to respond to alarms and perform emergency actions at the location of a fire, hazardous materials or other emergency incident. (d)  "Law enforcement officer" means any lawfully sworn officer, school resource officer or employee of the state or any political subdivision of the state whose duties require the officer or employee to investigate, pursue, apprehend, arrest, transport or maintain custody of persons who are charged with, suspected of committing, or convicted of a crime. (2)  (a)  The Attorney General's office shall make a monthly disability benefit payment equal to thirty-four percent (34%) of the covered individual's regular base salary at the time of injury when a covered individual, while engaged in the performance of the individual's official duties, is accidentally or intentionally injured in the line of duty as a direct result of a single incident.  The benefit shall be payable for the period of time the covered individual is physically unable to perform the duties of the covered individual's employment, not to exceed twelve (12) total payments for any one (1) injury.  Chronic or repetitive injury is not covered.  Benefits made available under this section shall be in addition to any workers' compensation benefits and shall be limited to the difference between the amount of workers' compensation benefits and the amount of the covered individual's regular base salary.  Compensation under this section shall not be awarded where a penal violation committed by the covered individual contributed to the disability or the injury was intentionally self-inflicted. (b)  Payments made under this subsection are exempt from the claims and demands of creditors of the covered individual. (3)  (a)  There is established in the State Treasury a special fund to be known as the Law Enforcement Officers and Fire Fighters Disability Benefits Fund.  The fund shall be funded by any funds made available by the Legislature or by donation, contribution, gift or any other source. (b)  The State Treasurer shall invest the monies of the fund in any of the investments authorized for the funds of the Public Employees' Retirement System under Section 25-11-121, and those investments shall be subject to the limitations prescribed by Section 25-11-121. (c)  Unexpended amounts remaining in the fund at the end of the state fiscal year shall not lapse into the State General Fund, and any income earned on amounts in the fund shall be deposited to the credit of the fund. (4)  The Attorney General's office shall be responsible for the management of the fund and the disbursement of disability benefits authorized under this section.  The Attorney General shall adopt rules and regulations necessary to implement and standardize the payment of disability benefits under this section, to administer the fund created by this section and to carry out the purposes of this section.  The Attorney General's office may expend up to ten percent (10%) of the monies in the fund for the administration and management of the fund and carrying out the purposes of this section. (5)  From and after July 1, 2016, the expenses of the Law Enforcement Officers and Fire Fighters Disability Benefits Fund shall be defrayed by appropriation from the State General Fund and all user charges and fees authorized under this section shall be deposited into the State General Fund as authorized by law and as determined by the State Fiscal Officer. (6)  From and after July 1, 2016, no state agency shall charge another state agency a fee, assessment, rent or other charge for services or resources received by authority of this section. SECTION 3.  This act shall take effect and be in force from and after July 1, 2026.